District of Columbia statutes.
8-1041.09

Supervision; immunity from liability.

(a)

The Mayor shall supervise the implementation of this chapter and manufacturer, partnership, and representative organization activities conducted in connection with this chapter, including commercial and competitive behavior; provided, that nothing in this section is intended to, or does, create a private right of action against the government of the District of Columbia and its officers, employees, agents, representatives, contractors, successors, and assigns based upon compliance or noncompliance with its provisions.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 45 of Title 28, a manufacturer or manufacturers and a partnership or representative organization may negotiate, enter into agreements with, share the burdens of their operation with, and conduct business with each other in accordance with this chapter in ways that may affect competition. No manufacturer, partnership, or representative organization shall be prosecuted, held liable, or subject to penalties or damages under Chapter 45 of Title 28, for actions conducted in accordance with this chapter.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 123, 61 DCR 9971